Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7911
Liability for activities relating to peer review.

(1) A health care provider or an individual (a) serving as a member or employee of a peer review committee, working on behalf of a peer review committee, furnishing counsel or services to a peer review committee, or participating in a peer review activity as an officer, director, employee, or member of a professional health care service entity or an officer, director, employee, or member of the governing board of a facility which is a health care provider and (b) acting without malice shall not be held liable in damages to any person for any acts, omissions, decisions, or other conduct within the scope of the functions of a peer review committee.

(2) A person who makes a report or provides information to a peer review committee shall not be subject to suit as a result of providing such information if such person acts without malice.

Laws 2011, LB431, § 8;

Laws 2019, LB119, § 6.